District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Rent Stabilization Protection Amendment Act of 2025”.


Sec. 2. The Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C.
Official Code § 42-3502.05 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 103 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3501.03) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (29B) is amended by striking the phrase “title II of this act” and
inserting the phrase “sections 205(g) through (h), 206 through 216, and 224 of this act” in its
place.
(2) A new paragraph (33B) is added to read as follows:
“(33B) “Subsidy administrator” means a federal or District agency or instrumentality or
other organization that makes rent payments to a housing provider as part of a tenant-based
subsidy program.”
(3) A new paragraph (36B) is added to read as follows:
“(36B) “Tenant-based subsidy program” means a federally or District-funded program
through which money is paid by a subsidy administrator to a housing provider as partial or total
rent, including the Housing Choice Voucher Program, the Local Rent Supplement Program, the
Family Re-housing Stabilization Program.”
(b) Section 205 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.05) is amended as follows:
(1) Section 205(a)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the Rent Stabilization Program
shall apply to each rental unit in the District; provided, that the following rental units shall be,
upon proper registration with the Rent Administrator in accordance with subsection (f) of this
section, exempt from the requirements of the Rent Stabilization Program:
“(1)(A) Any rental unit:
“(i) In a federally- or District-owned housing accommodation;


“(ii) In any housing accommodation with respect to which the
mortgage or rent is federally- or District-subsidized, if that subsidy is conditioned on the housing
provider limiting the rent for the subject rental unit and is not made pursuant to title III of this
Act, except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph; or,
“(iii) That is rented or co-leased by a home and community-based
services waiver provider and is occupied by a tenant with a disability as defined in section
103(29A) .
“(B)(i) The exemption provided by subparagraph (A)(ii) shall not include
a rental unit leased to and occupied by a tenant participating in a tenant-based subsidy program
under a lease commencing or renewed on or after October 1, 2026. If a rental unit leased to and
occupied by a tenant participating in a tenant-based subsidy program is under a month-to-month
lease, the exemption provided by subparagraph (A)(ii) shall not apply after April 1, 2027.
“(ii) For a rental unit subject to the Rent Stabilization Program
pursuant to subparagraph (B)(i):
“(I) Neither the tenant nor the subsidy administrator shall
sign a voluntary agreement pursuant to section 215;
“(II) Section 224 shall not apply to such tenants; and,
“(III) Both the tenant and the subsidy administrator shall
have standing to challenge any rent adjustment pursuant to section 216 and to obtain relief in
accordance with section 901.
“(iii) For any rental unit for which the exemption previously
provided by this paragraph terminates pursuant to subparagraph (B)(i), the allowable rent


charged pursuant to the Rent Stabilization Program shall be computed in accordance with
section 209.
(c) A new section 205(g)(3) is added to read as follows:
“(3) For a rental unit subject to the Rent Stabilization Program pursuant to section
205(a)(1)(B), a housing provider shall serve on the subsidy administrator a copy of any notice
required by paragraph (1) of this subection.
(d) A new section 205(j) is added to read as follows:
“(j) A subsidy administrator shall make a payment to a housing provider only after
receiving a copy of the notice required to be served on the tenant required by the Rent
Stabilization Program. The total rent paid to the housing provider may not exceed the amount
100 lawfully computed under the Rent Stabilization Program and timely filed with the Rent
101 Administrator.
102 “(1) Each subsidy administrator shall annually send to the Rent Administrator a
103 list of units that it is subsidizing that are subject to the Rent Stabilization Program and the rent
104 paid for each unit.
105 “(2) For so long as a tenant participating in a tenant-based subsidy program
106 occupies a rental unit subject to the Rent Stabilization Program, the subsidy administrator shall
107 take care and exercise all available legal remedies to ensure that any rent adjustment for the
108 rental unit complies with the Rent Stabilization Program.
109 “(3) The subsidy administrator shall not deny a request for annual increase that is
110 in compliance with the Rent Stabilization Program unless the proposed rent would:
111 “(i) be unreasonable pursuant to federal regulations governing the housing
112 assistance payment and rent (at 24 C.F.R. § 982.507 or its successor); or,


113 “(ii) deviate from any other federal or District law or regulation setting or
114 approving rent levels for subsidized tenancies.
115 “(4) Nothing in this Title is intended to allow a tenant who is part of a tenant-
116 based subsidy program to be treated differently from any other tenant in violation of the D.C.
117 Human Rights Act.”
118 (e) Section 206(e) (D.C. Official Code § 42–3502.06(e)) is amended to read as follows:
119 “(e) “For a rental unit subject to the Rent Stabilization Program pursuant to Subparagraph
120 205(a)(1)(B), a petition under section 216(a) shall always be timely. For any other rental unit, no
121 tenant may file a petition with respect to any rent adjustment, under any section of this chapter,
122 more than 3 years after the effective date of the adjustment.
123 (f) Section 216 (D.C. Official Code § 42–3502.16) is amended by striking the word
124 “tenant” wherever it appears and inserting the phrase “subsidy administrator, if one exists for the
125 unit, or tenant of the unit”.
126 (g) Section 209(a)(1)(A) (D.C. Official Code § 42–3502.09(a)(1)(A)) is amended to read
127 as follows:
128 “(A)(i) If the unit is not vacant when the exemption terminates or expires:
129 “(I) The sum of the rent charged on the date the unit
130 became exempt and each subsequent adjustment of general applicability authorized pursuant to
131 subsection 206(b); or
132 “(II) If the unit was exempt pursuant to section 205(a)(1)
133 for more than 12 years, the sum of the rent charged on the date the unit became exempt and
134 101.5% of each subsequent adjustment of general applicability authorized pursuant to section
135 206(b);


136 “(ii) If the unit is vacant when the exemption terminates or expires:
137 “(I) 110% of the sum authorized under sub-subparagraph
138 (i) of this subparagraph, if the previous tenant occupied the unit for 12 years or less; or
139 “(II) 120% of the sum authorized under sub-subparagraph
140 (i) of this subparagraph, if the previous tenant occupied the unit for more than 12 years.”
141 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
142 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
143 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
144 approved October 16, 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
145 Sec. 4. Effective date.
146 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
147 Mayor, action by the Council overriding the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
148 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
149 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).